Utah statutes.
63M-1-502.   Rulemaking authority.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and for purposes of this section, the office shall make rules:

(1)  to determine what constitutes:

(a)  substantial new employment;

(b)  new capital development; and

(c)  a project; and

(2)  to establish a formula for determining the allocated cap amount for each business applicant.

